Texas statutes.
WATER CODE

TITLE 2. WATER ADMINISTRATION

SUBTITLE A. EXECUTIVE AGENCIES

CHAPTER 10. WATER CONSERVATION ADVISORY COUNCIL

Sec. 10.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Best management practices" has the meaning assigned by Section 11.002.

(2) "Board" means the Texas Water Development Board.

(3) "Commission" means the Texas Commission on Environmental Quality.

(4) "Council" means the Water Conservation Advisory Council.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.002. PURPOSE. The council is created to provide the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, legislature, board, commission, political subdivisions, and public with the resource of a select council with expertise in water conservation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.003. CREATION AND MEMBERSHIP. (a) The council is composed of 23 members appointed by the board. The board shall appoint one member to represent each of the following entities or interest groups:

(1) Texas Commission on Environmental Quality;

(2) Department of Agriculture;

(3) Parks and Wildlife Department;

(4) State Soil and Water Conservation Board;

(5) Texas Water Development Board;

(6) regional water planning groups;

(7) federal agencies;

(8) municipalities;

(9) groundwater conservation districts;

(10) river authorities;

(11) environmental groups;

(12) irrigation districts;

(13) institutional water users;

(14) professional organizations focused on water conservation;

(15) higher education;

(16) agricultural groups;

(17) refining and chemical manufacturing;

(18) electric generation;

(19) mining and recovery of minerals;

(20) landscape irrigation and horticulture;

(21) water control and improvement districts;

(22) rural water users; and

(23) municipal utility districts.

(b) Each entity or interest group described by Subsection (a) may recommend one or more persons to fill the position on the council held by the member who represents that entity or interest group. If one or more persons are recommended for a position on the council, the board shall appoint one of the persons recommended to fill the position.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.004. TERMS. (a) Members of the council serve staggered terms of six years, with seven or eight members' terms, as applicable, expiring August 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) The board shall fill a vacancy on the council for the unexpired term by appointing a person who has the same qualifications as required under Section 10.003 for the person who previously held the vacated position.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.005. PRESIDING OFFICER. The council members shall select one member as the presiding officer of the council to serve in that capacity until the person's term as a council member expires.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.006. COUNCIL STAFF. On request by the council, the board shall provide any necessary staff to assist the council in the performance of its duties.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.007. PUBLIC MEETINGS AND PUBLIC INFORMATION. (a) The council may hold public meetings as needed to fulfill its duties under this chapter.

(b) The council is subject to Chapters 551 and 552, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.008. INAPPLICABILITY OF ADVISORY COMMITTEE LAW. Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the size, composition, or duration of the council.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.009. COMPENSATION OF MEMBERS. (a) Members of the council serve without compensation but may be reimbursed by legislative appropriation for actual and necessary expenses related to the performance of council duties.

(b) Reimbursement under Subsection (a) is subject to the approval of the presiding officer of the council.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 10.010. POWERS AND DUTIES OF COUNCIL. The council shall:

(1) monitor trends in water conservation implementation;

(2) monitor new technologies for possible inclusion by the board as best management practices in the best management practices guide developed by the water conservation implementation task force under Chapter 109, Acts of the 78th Legislature, Regular Session, 2003;

(3) monitor the effectiveness of the statewide water public awareness program developed under Section 16.026 and associated local involvement in implementation of the program;

(4) develop and implement a state water management resource library;

(5) develop and implement a public recognition program for water conservation;

(6) monitor the implementation of water conservation strategies by water users included in regional water plans; and

(7) monitor target and goal guidelines for water conservation to be considered by the board and commission.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 457 (S.B. 28), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 10.011. REPORT. Not later than December 1 of each even-numbered year, the council shall submit to the governor, lieutenant governor, and speaker of the house of representatives:

(1) a report on progress made in water conservation in this state; and

(2) recommendations for legislation to advance water conservation in this state, which may include conservation through the reduction of the amount of water lost because of evaporation.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1352 (H.B. 4), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1430 (S.B. 3), Sec. 2.03, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1151 (S.B. 551), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.